Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 8. Testing Legality of Detention.

§ 37.2-844.
Habeas corpus as means.

Any person held in custody because of his mental illness may by petition for a writ of habeas corpus have the question of the legality of his detention determined by a court of competent jurisdiction. Upon the petition, after notice to the authorities of the facility or other institution in which the person is confined, the court shall determine in a courtroom of the county or city or in some other convenient public place in that county or city, whether the person has a mental illness and whether he should be detained.

Any proceeding to challenge the continued secure inpatient treatment of a person held in custody as a sexually violent predator under Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of this title shall be conducted in accordance with §

37.2-910

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-122, 37-123; 1950, p. 916; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-103; 1976, c. 671; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716.

Cross references.

As to habeas corpus generally, see §§

8.01-654

through

8.01-668

.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 33 Writs and Injunctions. § 33.01 Writs. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1301 Petition for Writ of Habeas Corpus to Test Legality of Detention; No. 6-1302 Petition for Writ of Habeas Corpus Filed by Prisoner.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, §§ 1, 16; 10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, §§ 3, 5.

§ 37.2-845.
Procedure when person confined in facility or other institution.

If the person referenced in §

37.2-844

is held in custody and actually confined in any facility or other institution, he may file his petition in the circuit court of the county or the city in which the facility or other institution is located or in the circuit court of the county or the city adjoining the county or city in which the facility or other institution is located.

Any proceeding to challenge the continued secure inpatient treatment of any person held in custody as a sexually violent predator under Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of this title shall be conducted in the circuit court wherein the person was last convicted of a sexually violent offense or wherein the defendant was deemed unrestorably incompetent and referred for commitment pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-123; 1950, p. 916; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-104; 1976, c. 671; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-846.
Procedure when person not confined in facility or other institution.

In all cases, other than those provided for in §

37.2-845

, the person may file his petition in the circuit court of the county or the city in which he resides or in which he was found to have a mental illness or in which an order was entered authorizing his continued involuntary inpatient treatment, pursuant to Article 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of this title.

Any proceeding to challenge the continued secure inpatient treatment of any person held in custody as a sexually violent predator under Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of this title shall be conducted in the circuit court wherein the person was last convicted of a sexually violent offense or wherein the defendant was deemed unrestorably incompetent and referred for commitment pursuant to §

19.2-169.3

.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-124; 1950, p. 916; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-104.1; 1976, c. 671; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-847.
Duty of attorney for Commonwealth.

In any case to test the legality of the detention of a person pursuant to this article, whether by habeas corpus or otherwise, the attorney for the Commonwealth of the county or city in which the hearing is held shall, on request of the director of the facility or other institution having or claiming custody of the person, represent the Commonwealth in opposition to any such petition, appeal, or procedure for the discharge of the person from custody.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-125; 1950, p. 916; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-104.2; 1972, c. 639; 2005, c. 716.